Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1432.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding chapter 9, to read: CHAPTER 9 LEGAL TENDER ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS START_STATUTE1-901. Definitions In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Legal tender" means any medium of exchange, including specie, that is authorized by the united states constitution or congress for the payment of debts, public charges, taxes and dues, except for federally recognized central bank digital currency. 2. "Specie" means coins that have precious metal content. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE1-902. Central bank digital currency; prohibition; applicability A. Federally recognized central bank digital currency may not be used as legal tender or be the subject or medium of payment of any contract, security or other similar instrument in this state. B. Notwithstanding title 47, this section applies to all contracts, securities and other similar instruments, including contracts relating to commercial transactions. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 6-843, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE6-843. Disbursements; applicability A. Except as provided by subsection B of this section, an escrow agent may only disburse money out of an escrow account if deposits are previously made that are at least equal to the disbursements and the deposits relate directly to the transaction for which the money is being disbursed.  The deposits shall be in at least one of the following forms: 1. Wire transfers so that the monies are received by the escrow agent or the agent's depository. 2. Except as provided in paragraphs 1, 4 and 5 of this subsection, checks, drafts, negotiable orders of withdrawal, money orders or any other item that has become available for withdrawal in accordance with the federal expedited funds availability act (P.L. 100-86; 101 Stat. 635; 12 United States Code section 4001). 3. Credit transfers through the automated clearing house that are deemed available by the depository institution receiving the credits.  The credits must conform to the operating rules set forth by a national automated clearing house association. 4. Cashier's checks, certified checks or teller's checks that have been deposited in the escrow agent's depository account. 5. Checks made by an affiliate of a state or federally regulated depository institution where the check is drawn on the affiliated depository institution so that the monies are deposited in the escrow agent's depository account. 6. Distributed ledger technology transfers within or among a secure network of federally insured depository institutions where disbursements are recorded on a ledger and securely deposited in an escrow agent's depository account. A depository institution shall settle transfers by using an established national clearing house network, except that transfers may not be settled or backed by a central bank digital currency. Distributed ledger technology transfers shall be fully settled, irrevocably credited and transferred in United States dollars. For the purposes of this paragraph, "distributed ledger technology" means a decentralized, shared and immutable ledger, which may be public or private, permissioned or permissionless, or driven by tokenized crypto economics or tokenless. The ledger must be tamper resistant and protected with cryptography to preserve the data. For the purposes of this paragraph, a transfer, whether tokenized or tokenless, must maintain price stability by backing the value of the transferred digital asset to United States dollars that is redeemable on a one-to-one basis. B. An escrow agent may disburse up to $500 per transaction or any funds that are available as cash without complying with subsection A of this section. C. Transfers made pursuant to this section may not be settled or backed by federally recognized central bank digital currency. C. D. Subsection A of this section does not apply to account servicing. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 6-851, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE6-851. Definitions A. In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Trust business" means the holding out by a person to the public at large by advertising, solicitation or other means that the person is available to act as a fiduciary in this state and accepting and undertaking to perform the duties as such a fiduciary in the regular course of business. 2. "Trust company" means a corporation holding a certificate issued under this article. B. In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Agent" means a person who receives compensation to regularly perform services specifically related to the conduct of the trust business. 2. "Asset" means any property or property right held by a licensee for the benefit of another. 3. "Capital" means the total of outstanding common stock, preferred stock and surplus and undivided profits. 4. "Certificate" means a certificate of authority issued under this chapter to engage in trust business. 5. "Contingency plan" means a document stating a trust company's means of conducting business and preserving records in the event of any power outage, flood or other physical emergency. 6. "Discretionary assets" means those assets in which the trust company has the unilateral authority to determine investment strategies and execute investment transactions without seeking the concurrence, approval or authority from the customer or any other external party. 7. "Fiduciary" means a personal representative, administrator, guardian, conservator, trustee, agent or other person who acts in a fiduciary capacity and who is not exempt by section 6-852. 8. "Impaired" or "insolvent" means the trust company does not possess assets that are at least equal to liabilities, required reserves and total issued and outstanding capital. 9. "Legal tender" means a medium of exchange, including specie, that is authorized by the United States Constitution or Congress for the payment of debts, public charges, taxes and dues has the same meaning prescribed in section 1-901. 10. "Liquid capital" means legal tender, capital in the form of certificates of deposit issued by banks, savings banks or savings and loan associations doing business in this state and insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or any successor institution, including deposits to a single depository where excess deposit insurance is provided through a reciprocal deposit arrangement by participating banks, or direct obligations of the United States government with maturity of not more than five years. 11. "Nondiscretionary assets" means those assets for which the trust company must obtain from the customer, broker or investment advisor specific direction and instructions regarding both investment strategies and investment executions. 12. "Specie" means coins having precious metal content. 13. 12. "Surplus" means the total amount paid by shareholders in excess of the par or stated value of the shares of capital stock of a trust business in consideration for the shares. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 9-1443, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE9-1443. License fee; requirements, conditions and limitations; pass through to subscribers A. For the privilege of a video service provider to occupy or use, in whole or in part, any highway within the boundaries of a local government to provide video service through a video service network, the local government may require a video service provider to pay a license fee to the local government based on the gross revenue that the video service provider receives from its subscribers located within the boundaries of the local government.  The license fee both: 1. Is subject to the limit prescribed in section 9-1442, subsection B and to offset, including amounts collected from subscribers, as prescribed by section 9-1442, subsections A and I and subsection D of this section. 2. Shall be due no not more often than quarterly. B. If the local government requires a license fee pursuant to subsection A of this section, the local government shall adopt a local law that imposes the license fee equally and uniformly on all of the following that are operating within the boundaries of the local government: 1. Video service providers. 2. Holdover cable operators. C. A video service provider shall pay the entire amount of the license fee directly to the local government in a check, draft or note or automated clearinghouse transaction that is payable in legal tender as defined in section 43-1021 1-901. D. A video service provider may do all of the following: 1. Pass the license fee through to and collect the license fee from its subscribers within the boundaries of the local government, including for an incumbent cable operator any change in license fees that results from a change in the applicable definition of gross revenue. 2. Designate the amount of the license fee collected from each subscriber as a separate line item on the subscriber's bill. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 11-1943, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE11-1943. License fee; requirements; conditions and limitations; pass through to subscribers A. For the privilege of a video service provider to occupy or use, in whole or in part, any highway within the boundaries of a county to provide video service through a video service network, the county may require a video service provider to pay a license fee to the county based on the gross revenue that the video service provider receives from its subscribers located within the boundaries of the county.  The license fee both: 1. Is subject to the limit prescribed by section 11-1942, subsection B and to offset, including amounts collected from subscribers, as prescribed by section 11-1942, subsections A and I and subsection D of this section. 2. Shall be due no not more often than quarterly. B. If the county requires a license fee pursuant to subsection A of this section, the county shall adopt a local law that imposes the license fee equally and uniformly on all of the following that are operating within the boundaries of the county: 1. Video service providers. 2. Holdover cable operators. C. A video service provider shall pay the entire amount of the license fee directly to the county in a check, draft or note or automated clearinghouse transaction that is payable in legal tender as defined in section 43-1021 1-901. D. A video service provider may do all of the following: 1. Pass the license fee through to and collect the license fee from its subscribers within the boundaries of the county, including for an incumbent cable operator any change in license fees that results from a change in the applicable definition of gross revenue. 2. Designate the amount of the license fee collected from each subscriber as a separate line item on the subscriber's bill. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 43-1021, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE43-1021. Addition to Arizona gross income In computing Arizona adjusted gross income, the following amounts shall be added to Arizona gross income: 1. A beneficiary's share of the fiduciary adjustment to the extent that the amount determined by section 43-1333 increases the beneficiary's Arizona gross income. 2. An amount equal to the ordinary income portion of a lump sum distribution that was excluded from federal adjusted gross income pursuant to the special rule for individuals who attained fifty years of age before January 1, 1986 under Public Law 99-514, section 1122(h)(3). 3. The amount of interest income received on obligations of any state, territory or possession of the United States, or any political subdivision thereof, located outside of this state, reduced, for taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 1996, by the amount of any interest on indebtedness and other related expenses that were incurred or continued to purchase or carry those obligations and that are not otherwise deducted or subtracted in arriving at Arizona gross income. 4. The excess of a partner's share of partnership taxable income required to be included under chapter 14, article 2 of this title over the income required to be reported under section 702(a)(8) of the internal revenue code. 5. The excess of a partner's share of partnership losses determined pursuant to section 702(a)(8) of the internal revenue code over the losses allowable under chapter 14, article 2 of this title. 6. Any amount of agricultural water conservation expenses that were deducted pursuant to the internal revenue code for which a credit is claimed under section 43-1084. 7. The amount by which the depreciation or amortization computed under the internal revenue code with respect to property for which a credit was taken under section 43-1081.01 or that is pollution control equipment for which a credit was taken before taxable year 2022 exceeds the amount of depreciation or amortization computed pursuant to the internal revenue code on the Arizona adjusted basis of the property. 8. The amount by which the adjusted basis computed under the internal revenue code with respect to property for which a credit was claimed under section 43-1074.02 or 43-1081.01 or that is pollution control equipment for which a credit was taken before taxable year 2022 and that is sold or otherwise disposed of during the taxable year exceeds the adjusted basis of the property computed under section 43-1074.02 or 43-1081.01 or for pollution control equipment, the section in which the credit was taken, as applicable. 9. The deduction referred to in section 1341(a)(4) of the internal revenue code for restoration of a substantial amount held under a claim of right. 10. The amount by which a net operating loss carryover or capital loss carryover allowable pursuant to section 1341(b)(5) of the internal revenue code exceeds the net operating loss carryover or capital loss carryover allowable pursuant to section 43-1029, subsection F. 11. The amount of any depreciation allowance allowed pursuant to section 167(a) of the internal revenue code to the extent not previously added. 12. The amount of a nonqualified withdrawal, as defined in section 15-1871, from a college savings plan established pursuant to section 529 of the internal revenue code that is made to a distributee to the extent the amount is not included in computing federal adjusted gross income, except that the amount added under this paragraph shall not exceed the difference between the amount subtracted under section 43-1022 in prior taxable years and the amount added under this section in any prior taxable years. 13. If a subtraction is or has been taken by the taxpayer under section 43-1024, in the current or a prior taxable year for the full amount of eligible access expenditures paid or incurred to comply with the requirements of the Americans with disabilities act of 1990 (P.L. 101-336) or title 41, chapter 9, article 8, any amount of eligible access expenditures that is recognized under the internal revenue code, including any amount that is amortized according to federal amortization schedules, and that is included in computing taxable income for the current taxable year. 14. For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2017, the amount of any net capital loss included in Arizona gross income for the taxable year that is derived from the exchange of one kind of legal tender for another kind of legal tender. For the purposes of this paragraph, : (a) "legal tender" means a medium of exchange, including specie, that is authorized by the United States Constitution or Congress to pay debts, public charges, taxes and dues has the same meaning prescribed in section 1-901. (b) "Specie" means coins having precious metal content. 15. For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2021, the amount deducted by the partnership or S corporation pursuant to the internal revenue code for the amount paid to this state under section 43-1014 and for taxes that the department determines are substantially similar to the tax imposed under section 43-1014. This amount shall be reflected in the partner's or shareholder's Arizona gross income and the partnership's or S corporation's Arizona taxable income. 16. The amount of any motion picture production costs that was deducted pursuant to the internal revenue code for which a tax credit is claimed under section 43-1082.  END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 43-1022, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE43-1022. Subtractions from Arizona gross income In computing Arizona adjusted gross income, the following amounts shall be subtracted from Arizona gross income: 1. The amount of exemptions allowed by section 43-1023. 2. Benefits, annuities and pensions in an amount totaling not more than $2,500 received from one or more of the following: (a) The United States government service retirement and disability fund, the United States foreign service retirement and disability system and any other retirement system or plan established by federal law, except retired or retainer pay of the uniformed services of the United States that qualifies for a subtraction under paragraph 26 of this section. (b) The Arizona state retirement system, the corrections officer retirement plan, the public safety personnel retirement system, the elected officials' retirement plan, an optional retirement program established by the Arizona board of regents under section 15-1628, an optional retirement program established by a community college district board under section 15-1451 or a retirement plan established for employees of a county, city or town in this state. 3. A beneficiary's share of the fiduciary adjustment to the extent that the amount determined by section 43-1333 decreases the beneficiary's Arizona gross income. 4. Interest income received on obligations of the United States, minus any interest on indebtedness, or other related expenses, and deducted in arriving at Arizona gross income, that were incurred or continued to purchase or carry such obligations. 5. The excess of a partner's share of income required to be included under section 702(a)(8) of the internal revenue code over the income required to be included under chapter 14, article 2 of this title. 6. The excess of a partner's share of partnership losses determined pursuant to chapter 14, article 2 of this title over the losses allowable under section 702(a)(8) of the internal revenue code. 7. The amount allowed by section 43-1025 for contributions during the taxable year of agricultural crops to charitable organizations. 8. The portion of any wages or salaries paid or incurred by the taxpayer for the taxable year that is equal to the amount of the federal work opportunity credit, the empowerment zone employment credit, the credit for employer paid social security taxes on employee cash tips and the Indian employment credit that the taxpayer received under sections 45A, 45B, 51(a) and 1396 of the internal revenue code. 9. The amount of exploration expenses that is determined pursuant to section 617 of the internal revenue code, that has been deferred in a taxable year ending before January 1, 1990 and for which a subtraction has not previously been made. The subtraction shall be made on a ratable basis as the units of produced ores or minerals discovered or explored as a result of this exploration are sold. 10. The amount included in federal adjusted gross income pursuant to section 86 of the internal revenue code, relating to taxation of social security and railroad retirement benefits. 11. To the extent not already excluded from Arizona gross income under the internal revenue code, compensation received for active service as a member of the reserves, the national guard or the armed forces of the United States, including compensation for service in a combat zone as determined under section 112 of the internal revenue code. 12. The amount of unreimbursed medical and hospital costs, adoption counseling, legal and agency fees and other nonrecurring costs of adoption.  The subtraction under this paragraph may be taken for the costs that are described in this paragraph and that are incurred in prior years, but the subtraction may be taken only in the year during which the final adoption order is granted.  The amount subtracted may not exceed: (a) In taxable years beginning before December 31, 2025, $3,000. In the case of a husband and wife who file separate returns, the subtraction may be taken by either taxpayer or may be divided between them, but the total subtractions allowed both husband and wife may not exceed $3,000. (b) In taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2025, $5,000 for a single individual or head of household. (c) For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2025, $10,000 for a married couple filing a joint return.  In the case of a husband and wife who file separate returns, the subtraction may be taken by either taxpayer or may be divided between them, but the total subtractions allowed both husband and wife may not exceed $10,000. 13. The amount authorized by section 43-1027 for the taxable year relating to qualified wood stoves, wood fireplaces or gas fired fireplaces. 14. The amount by which a net operating loss carryover or capital loss carryover allowable pursuant to section 43-1029, subsection F exceeds the net operating loss carryover or capital loss carryover allowable pursuant to section 1341(b)(5) of the internal revenue code. 15. Any amount of qualified educational expenses that is distributed from a qualified state tuition program determined pursuant to section 529 of the internal revenue code and that is included in income in computing federal adjusted gross income. 16. Any item of income resulting from an installment sale that has been properly subjected to income tax in another state in a previous taxable year and that is included in Arizona gross income in the current taxable year. 17. For property placed in service: (a) In taxable years beginning before December 31, 2012, an amount equal to the depreciation allowable pursuant to section 167(a) of the internal revenue code for the taxable year computed as if the election described in section 168(k) of the internal revenue code had been made for each applicable class of property in the year the property was placed in service. (b) In taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2012 through December 31, 2013, an amount determined in the year the asset was placed in service based on the calculation in subdivision (a) of this paragraph. In the first taxable year beginning from and after December 31, 2013, the taxpayer may elect to subtract the amount necessary to make the depreciation claimed to date for the purposes of this title the same as it would have been if subdivision (c) of this paragraph had applied for the entire time the asset was in service. Subdivision (c) of this paragraph applies for the remainder of the asset's life. If the taxpayer does not make the election under this subdivision, subdivision (a) of this paragraph applies for the remainder of the asset's life. (c) In taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2013 through December 31, 2015, an amount equal to the depreciation allowable pursuant to section 167(a) of the internal revenue code for the taxable year as computed as if the additional allowance for depreciation had been ten percent of the amount allowed pursuant to section 168(k) of the internal revenue code. (d) In taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2015 through December 31, 2016, an amount equal to the depreciation allowable pursuant to section 167(a) of the internal revenue code for the taxable year as computed as if the additional allowance for depreciation had been fifty-five percent of the amount allowed pursuant to section 168(k) of the internal revenue code. (e) In taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2016, an amount equal to the depreciation allowable pursuant to section 167(a) of the internal revenue code for the taxable year as computed as if the additional allowance for depreciation had been the full amount allowed pursuant to section 168(k) of the internal revenue code. 18. With respect to property that is sold or otherwise disposed of during the taxable year by a taxpayer that complied with section 43-1021, paragraph 11 with respect to that property, the amount of depreciation that has been allowed pursuant to section 167(a) of the internal revenue code to the extent that the amount has not already reduced Arizona taxable income in the current or prior taxable years. 19. The amount contributed during the taxable year to college savings plans established pursuant to section 529 of the internal revenue code on behalf of the designated beneficiary to the extent that the contributions were not deducted in computing federal adjusted gross income. The amount subtracted may not exceed: (a) $2,000 per beneficiary for a single individual or a head of household. (b) $4,000 per beneficiary for a married couple filing a joint return. In the case of a husband and wife who file separate returns, the subtraction may be taken by either taxpayer or may be divided between them, but the total subtractions allowed both husband and wife may not exceed $4,000 per beneficiary. 20. The portion of the net operating loss carryforward that would have been allowed as a deduction in the current year pursuant to section 172 of the internal revenue code if the election described in section 172(b)(1)(H) of the internal revenue code had not been made in the year of the loss that exceeds the actual net operating loss carryforward that was deducted in arriving at federal adjusted gross income.  This subtraction only applies to taxpayers who made an election under section 172(b)(1)(H) of the internal revenue code as amended by section 1211 of the American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 (P.L. 111-5) or as amended by section 13 of the worker, homeownership, and business assistance act of 2009 (P.L. 111-92). 21. For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2013, the amount of any net capital gain included in federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year derived from investment in a qualified small business as determined by the Arizona commerce authority pursuant to section 41-1518. 22. An amount of any net long-term capital gain included in federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year that is derived from an investment in an asset acquired after December 31, 2011, as follows: (a) For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2012 through December 31, 2013, ten percent of the net long-term capital gain included in federal adjusted gross income. (b) For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2013 through December 31, 2014, twenty percent of the net long-term capital gain included in federal adjusted gross income. (c) For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2014, twenty-five percent of the net long-term capital gain included in federal adjusted gross income.  For the purposes of this paragraph, a transferee that receives an asset by gift or at the death of a transferor is considered to have acquired the asset when the asset was acquired by the transferor. If the date an asset is acquired cannot be verified, a subtraction under this paragraph is not allowed. 23. If an individual is not claiming itemized deductions pursuant to section 43-1042, the amount of premium costs for long-term care insurance, as defined in section 20-1691. 24. The amount of eligible access expenditures paid or incurred during the taxable year to comply with the requirements of the Americans with disabilities act of 1990 (P.L. 101-336) or title 41, chapter 9, article 8 as provided by section 43-1024. 25. For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2017, the amount of any net capital gain included in Arizona gross income for the taxable year that is derived from the exchange of one kind of legal tender for another kind of legal tender. For the purposes of this paragraph, : (a) "legal tender" means a medium of exchange, including specie, that is authorized by the United States Constitution or Congress to pay debts, public charges, taxes and dues has the same meaning prescribed in section 1-901. (b) "Specie" means coins having precious metal content. 26. Benefits, annuities and pensions received as retired or retainer pay of the uniformed services of the United States in amounts as follows: (a) For taxable years through December 31, 2018, an amount totaling not more than $2,500. (b) For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2018 through December 31, 2020, an amount totaling not more than $3,500. (c) For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2020, the full amount received. 27. For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2020, the amount contributed during the taxable year to an achieving a better life experience account established pursuant to section 529A of the internal revenue code on behalf of the designated beneficiary to the extent that the contributions were not deducted in computing federal adjusted gross income.  The amount subtracted may not exceed: (a) $2,000 per beneficiary for a single individual or a head of household. (b) $4,000 per beneficiary for a married couple filing a joint return.  In the case of a husband and wife who file separate returns, the subtraction may be taken by either taxpayer or may be divided between them, but the total subtractions allowed both husband and wife may not exceed $4,000 per beneficiary. 28. For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2020, Arizona small business gross income but only if an individual taxpayer has elected to separately report and pay tax on the taxpayer's Arizona small business adjusted gross income on the Arizona small business income tax return. 29. To the extent not already excluded from Arizona gross income under the internal revenue code, the value of virtual currency and non-fungible tokens the taxpayer received pursuant to an airdrop at the time of the airdrop. This paragraph may not be interpreted as providing a subtraction for any appreciation in value that occurs from holding the virtual currency after the initial receipt of the airdrop. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Airdrop" means the receipt of virtual currency through a means of distribution of virtual currency to the distributed ledger addresses of multiple taxpayers. (b) "Non-fungible token" has the same meaning prescribed in section 43-1028. (c) "Virtual currency" has the same meaning prescribed in section 43-1028. 30. The amount allowed as a subtraction by section 43-1028 for gas fees not already included in the taxpayer's virtual currency or non-fungible token basis. END_STATUTE Sec. 8. Section 43-1121, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE43-1121. Additions to Arizona gross income; corporations In computing Arizona taxable income for a corporation, the following amounts shall be added to Arizona gross income: 1. The amount of interest income received on obligations of any state, territory or possession of the United States, or any political subdivision thereof, located outside this state, reduced, for taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 1996, by the amount of any interest on indebtedness and other related expenses that were incurred or continued to purchase or carry those obligations and that are not otherwise deducted or subtracted in arriving at Arizona gross income. 2. The excess of a partner's share of partnership taxable income required to be included under chapter 14, article 2 of this title over the income required to be reported under section 702(a)(8) of the internal revenue code. 3. The excess of a partner's share of partnership losses determined pursuant to section 702(a)(8) of the internal revenue code over the losses allowable under chapter 14, article 2 of this title. 4. The amount of any depreciation allowance allowed pursuant to section 167(a) of the internal revenue code to the extent not previously added. 5. The amount of dividend income received from corporations and allowed as a deduction pursuant to sections 243, 245, 245A and 250(a)(1)(B) of the internal revenue code. 6. Taxes that are based on income paid to states, local governments or foreign governments and that were deducted in computing federal taxable income. 7. Expenses and interest relating to tax-exempt income on indebtedness incurred or continued to purchase or carry obligations the interest on which is wholly exempt from the tax imposed by this title. Financial institutions, as defined in section 6-101, shall be governed by section 43-961, paragraph 2. 8. Commissions, rentals and other amounts paid or accrued to a domestic international sales corporation controlled by the payor corporation if the domestic international sales corporation is not required to report its taxable income to this state because its income is not derived from or attributable to sources within this state. If the domestic international sales corporation is subject to article 4 of this chapter, the department shall prescribe by rule the method of determining the portion of the commissions, rentals and other amounts that are paid or accrued to the controlled domestic international sales corporation and that shall be deducted by the payor.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "control" means direct or indirect ownership or control of fifty percent or more of the voting stock of the domestic international sales corporation by the payor corporation. 9. The amount of net operating loss taken pursuant to section 172 of the internal revenue code. 10. The amount of exploration expenses determined pursuant to section 617 of the internal revenue code to the extent that they exceed $75,000 and to the extent that the election is made to defer those expenses not in excess of $75,000. 11. Amortization of costs incurred to install pollution control devices and deducted pursuant to the internal revenue code or the amount of deduction for depreciation taken pursuant to the internal revenue code on pollution control devices for which an election is made pursuant to section 43-1129. 12. The amount of depreciation or amortization of costs of child care facilities deducted pursuant to section 167 or 188 of the internal revenue code for which an election is made to amortize pursuant to section 43-1130. 13. The loss of an insurance company that is exempt under section 43-1201 to the extent that it is included in computing Arizona gross income on a consolidated return pursuant to section 43-947. 14. The amount by which the depreciation or amortization computed under the internal revenue code with respect to property for which a credit was taken under section 43-1170 exceeds the amount of depreciation or amortization computed pursuant to the internal revenue code on the Arizona adjusted basis of the property. 15. The amount by which the adjusted basis computed under the internal revenue code with respect to property for which a credit was claimed under section 43-1170 and that is sold or otherwise disposed of during the taxable year exceeds the adjusted basis of the property computed under section 43-1170. 16. The deduction referred to in section 1341(a)(4) of the internal revenue code for restoration of a substantial amount held under a claim of right. 17. The amount by which a capital loss carryover allowable pursuant to section 1341(b)(5) of the internal revenue code exceeds the capital loss carryover allowable pursuant to section 43-1130.01, subsection F. 18. Any wage expenses deducted pursuant to the internal revenue code for which a credit is claimed under section 43-1175 and representing net increases in qualified employment positions for employment of temporary assistance for needy families recipients. 19. Any amount of expenses that were deducted pursuant to the internal revenue code and for which a credit is claimed under section 43-1178. 20. Any amount deducted pursuant to section 170 of the internal revenue code representing contributions to a school tuition organization for which a credit is claimed under section 43-1183 or 43-1184. 21. If a subtraction is or has been taken by the taxpayer under section 43-1124, in the current or a prior taxable year for the full amount of eligible access expenditures paid or incurred to comply with the requirements of the Americans with disabilities act of 1990 (P.L. 101-336) or title 41, chapter 9, article 8, any amount of eligible access expenditures that is recognized under the internal revenue code, including any amount that is amortized according to federal amortization schedules, and that is included in computing Arizona taxable income for the current taxable year. 22. For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2017, the amount of any net capital loss included in Arizona gross income for the taxable year that is derived from the exchange of one kind of legal tender for another kind of legal tender. For the purposes of this paragraph, : (a) "legal tender" means a medium of exchange, including specie, that is authorized by the United States Constitution or Congress to pay debts, public charges, taxes and dues has the same meaning prescribed in section 1-901. (b) "Specie" means coins having precious metal content. 23. The amount of any deduction that is claimed in computing Arizona gross income and that represents a donation of a school site for which a credit is claimed under section 43-1181. 24. The amount of any motion picture production costs that was deducted pursuant to the internal revenue code for which a tax credit is claimed under section 43-1165. END_STATUTE Sec. 9. Section 43-1122, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE43-1122. Subtractions from Arizona gross income; corporations In computing Arizona taxable income for a corporation, the following amounts shall be subtracted from Arizona gross income: 1. The excess of a partner's share of income required to be included under section 702(a)(8) of the internal revenue code over the income required to be included under chapter 14, article 2 of this title. 2. The excess of a partner's share of partnership losses determined pursuant to chapter 14, article 2 of this title over the losses allowable under section 702(a)(8) of the internal revenue code. 3. The amount allowed by section 43-1025 for contributions during the taxable year of agricultural crops to charitable organizations. 4. The portion of any wages or salaries paid or incurred by the taxpayer for the taxable year that is equal to the amount of the federal work opportunity credit, the empowerment zone employment credit, the credit for employer paid social security taxes on employee cash tips and the Indian employment credit that the taxpayer received under sections 45A, 45B, 51(a) and 1396 of the internal revenue code. 5. With respect to property that is sold or otherwise disposed of during the taxable year by a taxpayer that complied with section 43-1121, paragraph 4 with respect to that property, the amount of depreciation that has been allowed pursuant to section 167(a) of the internal revenue code to the extent that the amount has not already reduced Arizona taxable income in the current taxable year or prior taxable years. 6. With respect to a financial institution as defined in section 6-101, expenses and interest relating to tax-exempt income disallowed pursuant to section 265 of the internal revenue code. 7. Dividends received from another corporation owned or controlled directly or indirectly by a recipient corporation. For the purposes of this paragraph, "control" means direct or indirect ownership or control of fifty percent or more of the voting stock of the payor corporation by the recipient corporation. Dividends shall have the meaning provided in section 316 of the internal revenue code. This subtraction shall apply without regard to section 43-961, paragraph 2 and article 4 of this chapter. 8. Interest income received on obligations of the United States. 9. The amount of dividend income from foreign corporations.  For the purposes of this paragraph, gross up income as described in section 78 of the internal revenue code, global intangible low-taxed income as defined in section 951A of the internal revenue code and subpart F income as defined in section 952 of the internal revenue code shall be considered foreign dividends. 10. The amount of net operating loss allowed by section 43-1123. 11. The amount of any state income tax refunds received that were included as income in computing federal taxable income. 12. The amount of expense recapture included in income pursuant to section 617 of the internal revenue code for mine exploration expenses. 13. The amount of deferred exploration expenses allowed by section 43-1127. 14. The amount of exploration expenses related to the exploration of oil, gas or geothermal resources, computed in the same manner and on the same basis as a deduction for mine exploration pursuant to section 617 of the internal revenue code. This computation is subject to the adjustments contained in section 43-1121, paragraph 10 and paragraphs 12 and 13 of this section relating to exploration expenses. 15. The amortization of pollution control devices allowed by section 43-1129. 16. The amount of amortization of the cost of child care facilities pursuant to section 43-1130. 17. The amount of income from a domestic international sales corporation required to be included in the income of its shareholders pursuant to section 995 of the internal revenue code. 18. The income of an insurance company that is exempt under section 43-1201 to the extent that it is included in computing Arizona gross income on a consolidated return pursuant to section 43-947. 19. The amount by which a capital loss carryover allowable pursuant to section 43-1130.01, subsection F exceeds the capital loss carryover allowable pursuant to section 1341(b)(5) of the internal revenue code. 20. An amount equal to the depreciation allowable pursuant to section 167(a) of the internal revenue code for the taxable year computed as if the election described in section 168(k)(7) of the internal revenue code had been made for each applicable class of property in the year the property was placed in service. 21. The amount of eligible access expenditures paid or incurred during the taxable year to comply with the requirements of the Americans with disabilities act of 1990 (P.L. 101-336) or title 41, chapter 9, article 8 as provided by section 43-1124. 22. For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2017, the amount of any net capital gain included in Arizona gross income for the taxable year that is derived from the exchange of one kind of legal tender for another kind of legal tender. For the purposes of this paragraph, : (a) "legal tender" means a medium of exchange, including specie, that is authorized by the United States Constitution or Congress to pay debts, public charges, taxes and dues has the same meaning prescribed in section 1-901. (b) "Specie" means coins having precious metal content. 23. With respect to a public service corporation operating a water system or sewage disposal facility, the amount of monies or property received as a contribution in aid of construction.  For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Contribution in aid of construction" means any amount of monies or other property contributed to a public service corporation that provides water or sewage disposal services to the extent that the purpose of the contribution is to provide for expanding, improving or replacing the public service corporation's water system or sewage disposal facilities, including any amount of monies or other property contributed to a public service corporation for a water system or sewage disposal facility subject to a contingent obligation to repay the amount, in whole or in part, to the contributor. (b) "Public service corporation" means a public service corporation as defined in article XV, section 2, Constitution of Arizona, that is regulated by the corporation commission. END_STATUTE Sec. 10. Section 47-1201, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE47-1201. General definitions A. Unless the context otherwise requires, words or phrases defined in this section, or in the additional definitions contained in other chapters of this title that apply to particular chapters or parts thereof of chapters, have the meanings stated. B. Subject to definitions contained in other chapters of this title that apply to particular chapters or parts thereof of chapters: 1. "Action", in the sense of a judicial proceeding, includes recoupment, counterclaim, set-off, suit in equity and any other proceeding in which rights are determined. 2. "Aggrieved party" means a party entitled to pursue a remedy. 3. "Agreement", as distinguished from "contract", means the bargain of the parties in fact, as found in their language or inferred from other circumstances, including course of performance, course of dealing or usage of trade as provided in section 47-1303. 4. "Bank": (a) Means a person engaged in the business of banking. and (b) Includes a savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union and trust company. 5. "Bearer" means a person in control of a negotiable electronic document of title or a person in possession of a negotiable instrument, negotiable tangible document of title or certificated security that is payable to bearer or indorsed in blank. 6. "Bill of lading": (a) Means a document of title evidencing the receipt of goods for shipment issued by a person engaged in the business of directly or indirectly transporting or forwarding goods.  The term (b) Does not include a warehouse receipt. 7. "Branch" includes a separately incorporated foreign branch of a bank. 8. "Burden of establishing" a fact means the burden of persuading the trier of fact that the existence of the fact is more probable than its nonexistence. 9. "Buyer in ordinary course of business": (a) Means a person that buys goods in good faith, without knowledge that the sale violates the rights of another person in the goods, and in the ordinary course from a person, other than a pawnbroker, in the business of selling goods of that kind. A person buys goods in the ordinary course if the sale to the person comports with the usual or customary practices in the kind of business in which the seller is engaged or with the seller's own usual or customary practices.  A person that sells oil, gas or other minerals at the wellhead or minehead is a person in the business of selling goods of that kind.  A buyer in ordinary course of business may buy for cash, by exchange of other property or on secured or unsecured credit, and may acquire goods or documents of title under a preexisting contract for sale.  Only a buyer that takes possession of the goods or has a right to recover the goods from the seller under chapter 2 of this title may be a buyer in ordinary course of business.  Buyer in ordinary course of business (b) Does not include a person that acquires goods in a transfer in bulk or as security for or in total or partial satisfaction of a money debt. 10. "Conspicuous", with reference to a term, means so written, displayed or presented that a reasonable person against which it is to operate ought to have noticed it.  Whether a term is conspicuous or not is a decision for the court.  Conspicuous terms include any of the following: (a) A heading in capitals equal to or greater in size than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font or color to the surrounding text of the same or lesser size. ; and (b) Language in the body of a record or display in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks that call attention to the language. 11. "Consumer" means an individual who enters into a transaction primarily for personal, family or household purposes. 12. "Contract", as distinguished from "agreement", means the total legal obligation that results from the parties' agreement as determined by this title as supplemented by any other applicable laws. 13. "Creditor" includes a general creditor, a secured creditor, a lien creditor and any representative of creditors, including an assignee for the benefit of creditors, a trustee in bankruptcy, a receiver in equity and an executor or administrator of an insolvent debtor's or assignor's estate. 14. "Defendant" includes a person in the position of defendant in a counterclaim, cross-claim or third-party claim. 15. "Delivery", with respect to an electronic document of title, means voluntary transfer of control, and with respect to an instrument, a tangible document of title or chattel paper means voluntary transfer of possession. 16. "Document of title" means a record: (a) That in the regular course of business or financing is treated as adequately evidencing that the person in possession or control of the record is entitled to receive, control, hold and dispose of the record and the goods the record covers; and (b) That purports to be issued by or addressed to a bailee and to cover goods in the bailee's possession that are either identified or are fungible portions of an identified mass. The term includes a bill of lading, transport document, dock warrant, dock receipt, warehouse receipt and order for delivery of goods.  An electronic document of title means a document of title evidenced by a record consisting of information stored in an electronic medium.  A tangible document of title means a document of title evidenced by a record consisting of information that is inscribed on a tangible medium. 17. "Fault" means a default, breach or wrongful act or omission. 18. "Fungible goods" means: (a) Goods of which any unit, by nature or usage of trade, is the equivalent of any other like unit; or (b) Goods that by agreement are treated as equivalent. 19. "Genuine" means free of forgery or counterfeiting. 20. "Good faith" means honesty in fact in the conduct or transaction concerned. 21. "Holder" means: (a) The person in possession of a negotiable instrument that is payable either to bearer or to an identified person that is the person in possession; (b) The person in possession of a negotiable tangible document of title if the goods are deliverable either to bearer or to the order of the person in possession; or (c) The person in control of a negotiable electronic document of title. 22. "Insolvency proceeding" includes an assignment for the benefit of creditors or other proceeding intended to liquidate or rehabilitate the estate of the person involved. 23. "Insolvent" means any of the following: (a) Having generally ceased to pay debts in the ordinary course of business other than as a result of bona fide dispute. ; (b) Being unable to pay debts as they become due. ; or (c) Being insolvent within the meaning of federal bankruptcy law. 24. "Money": (a) Means a medium of exchange currently authorized or adopted by a domestic or foreign government.  The term (b) Includes a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement between two or more countries. (c) Does not include federally RECOGNIZED central bank digital currency. 25. "Organization" means a person other than an individual. 26. "Party", as distinguished from third party", means a person that has engaged in a transaction or made an agreement subject to this title. 27. "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, public corporation or any other legal or commercial entity. 28. "Present value" means the amount as of a date certain of one or more sums payable in the future, discounted to the date certain by use of either an interest rate specified by the parties if that rate is not manifestly unreasonable at the time the transaction is entered into or, if an interest rate is not so specified, a commercially reasonable rate that takes into account the facts and circumstances at the time the transaction is entered into. 29. "Purchase" means taking by sale, lease, discount, negotiation, mortgage, pledge, lien, security interest, issue or reissue, gift or any other voluntary transaction creating an interest in property. 30. "Purchaser" means a person that takes by purchase. 31. "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. 32. "Remedy" means any remedial right to which an aggrieved party is entitled with or without resort to a tribunal. 33. "Representative" means a person empowered to act for another, including an agent, an officer of a corporation or association and a trustee, executor or administrator of an estate. 34. "Right" includes remedy. 35. "Security interest" means an interest in personal property or fixtures that secures payment or performance of an obligation.  Security interest includes any interest of a consignor and a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, a payment intangible or a promissory note in a transaction that is subject to chapter 9 of this title.  Security interest does not include the special property interest of a buyer of goods on identification of those goods to a contract for sale under section 47-2401, but a buyer may also acquire a security interest by complying with chapter 9 of this title. Except as otherwise provided in section 47-2505, the right of a seller or lessor of goods under chapter 2 or 2A of this title to retain or acquire possession of the goods is not a security interest, but a seller or lessor may also acquire a security interest by complying with chapter 9 of this title.  The retention or reservation of title by a seller of goods notwithstanding shipment or delivery to the buyer under section 47-2401 is limited in effect to a reservation of a security interest.  Whether a transaction in the form of a lease creates a security interest is determined pursuant to section 47-1203. 36. "Send" in connection with a writing, record or notice means either of the following: (a) To deposit in the mail or deliver for transmission by any other usual means of communication with postage or cost of transmission provided for and properly addressed and, in the case of an instrument, to an address specified thereon or otherwise agreed, or if there is none to any address reasonable under the circumstances. ; or (b) In any other way to cause to be received any record or notice within the time it would have arrived if properly sent. 37. "Signed" includes using any symbol executed or adopted with present intention to adopt or accept a writing. 38. "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. 39. "Surety" includes a guarantor or other secondary obligor. 40. "Term" means a portion of an agreement that relates to a particular matter. 41. "Unauthorized signature": (a) Means a signature made without actual, implied or apparent authority.  The term (b) Includes a forgery. 42. "Warehouse receipt" means a document of title issued by a person engaged in the business of storing goods for hire. 43. "Writing" includes printing, typewriting or any other intentional reduction to tangible form. "Written" has a corresponding meaning. END_STATUTE